Louisiana, session 2026, SB147.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:1730.28.2(A)(4) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1730.28.2. State Uniform Construction Code; requirements and prohibitions
A. The State Uniform Construction Code shall:
* * *
(4) Require that the construction of a new roof or the replacement of a
roof on residential property meet or exceed the fortified roof standards of the
Insurance Institute for Business and Home Safety.
* * *
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-402 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 147